Assets/StreamingAssets/CroatianNew.dic
ajnc/286
Ambroz/293
Amerigo/303
Antarktik/265
Aristotel/293
bajc/273
Bajkal/291
bazilisk/272
Beč/265
Belje/298
Benkovac/271
besmisao/304
Biograd/291
bit/285
boljitak/260
Borneo/298
brendi/304
Brezovac/271
Bribir/265
brijest/280
broj/287
Bukurešt/291
bušido/298
Celovec/271
cic/287
cijep/273
cipal/271
cunami/304
činilac/263
Čiovo/298
Črnomerac/271
dar/273
darmštatij/268
David/293
demant/304
desetoboj/287
disko/298
djevojče/304
dobitak/260
Dolac/271
dovratak/260
dril/273
drveće/298
đavao/304
Đurđevac/271
Egej/266
ego/298
Ekvador/291
Ezop/293
Ferdo/303
filc/286
fluks/273
frizbi/304
gaj/288
gasilac/262
Gestapo/265
glanc/286
golf/283
gordon/293
Gradac/271
granje/298
grizli/304
groš/287
herc/286
Herodot/293
Hindustan/265
hipi/304
hitac/260
hol/273
Ivanec/271
izlazak/260
Izrael/293
izvjestilac/262
jare/304
Jasenovac/271
jazz/265
Josephson/293
juli/304
jurjevo/298
Karlobag/265
Karlovac/271
Kavkaz/291
kec/286
kelj/287
kikiriki/304
klaun/209
Kolumbo/303
kombi/304
Konstantin/293
konjovodac/260
kraj/287
kreč/265
krmče/304
krug/273
Kupres/291
kvarc/286
Leonardo/303
ležaj/287
Lipovac/271
Lisabon/291
lom/273
Ludovik/266
mač/287
mačevalac/263
Manduševac/271
martini/304
Mateo/303
Mediteran/291
međuzbroj/287
Menelaj/266
Mihajlo/303
Miholjac/271
Mosor/265
mot/273
muž/288
naprstak/271
narezak/260
Nazaret/291
Nedeljko/303
nedonošče/304
nerc/286
Nil/265
obelisk/271
očevidac/260
Otočac/271
Oziris/266
pakao/304
panj/287
Pašman/291
Pazin/265
Petrovac/271
pilence/307
plašt/287
plod/273
početak/260
Pokuplje/298
polonij/268
posljedak/260
pregalac/263
Primošten/265
privjesak/271
progonilac/263
pseudokod/273
ptiče/304
puč/290
rab/291
raj/290
Remetinec/271
Rovinj/265
ručak/248
sat/208
Silvio/303
sjaj/287
sjeveroistok/265
Skadar/271
slučaj/287
smok/273
solarij/304
spasilac/263
sprej/287
Staljingrad/291
stereotip/283
stijenje/286
Supilo/303
Svačić/266
svizac/260
šaš/287
šćir/273
štrk/273
tečaj/287
Tobago/265
trakt/273
trenutak/260
trnje/298
Tuđman/293
tuš/287
unuče/304
vatrogasac/260
videospot/273
Vrbovec/298
vrč/287
Vrgorac/271
Vukovar/265
zalazak/260
zuj/287
zvijere/304
žetelac/263
Žrnovo/298
žur/273
